Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-568
Sections, how construed.

Sections 60-501 to 60-569 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact them.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 68, p. 504.